Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 3. Termination of Parental Rights
§ 14-2-309.
Grounds for termination of parent-child relationship; clear and convincing evidence.

The parent-child legal relationship may be terminated if any one (1) or more of the following facts is established by clear and convincing evidence:

The child has been left in the care of another person without provision for the child’s support and without communication from the absent parent for a period of at least one (1) year. In making the above determination, the court may disregard occasional contributions, or incidental contacts and communications. For purposes of this paragraph, a court order of custody shall not preclude a finding that a child has been left in the care of another person;

The child has been abandoned with no means of identification for at least three (3) months and efforts to locate the parent have been unsuccessful;

The child has been abused or neglected by the parent and reasonable efforts by an authorized agency or mental health professional have been unsuccessful in rehabilitating the family or the family has refused rehabilitative treatment, and it is shown that the child’s health and safety would be seriously jeopardized by remaining with or returning to the parent;

The parent is incarcerated due to the conviction of a felony and a showing that the parent is unfit to have the custody and control of the child;

The child has been in foster care under the responsibility of the state of Wyoming for fifteen (15) of the most recent twenty-two (22) months, and a showing that the parent is unfit to have custody and control of the child;

The child is abandoned at less than one (1) year of age and has been abandoned for at least six (6) months;

The child was relinquished to a safe haven provider in accordance with W.S.

14-11-101

through

14-11-109

, and neither parent has affirmatively sought the return of the child within three (3) months from the date of relinquishment;

The parent is convicted of murder or homicide of the other parent of the child under W.S.

6-2-101

through

6-2-104

;

The parent committed sexual assault and the child was conceived as a result of the sexual assault. For the purposes of this paragraph, the following shall apply:

A person committed sexual assault if the person was convicted of an offense under W.S.

6-2-302

,

6-2-303

,

6-2-314

through

6-2-316

or other similar law of another jurisdiction;

Reasonable effort to reunify the family is not required to terminate parental rights;

This paragraph shall not apply if the parent seeking termination was married to or cohabiting with the parent committing the sexual assault resulting in the birth of the child for not less than two (2) years immediately after the birth of the child. Nothing in this subparagraph shall be construed as limiting a parent from seeking termination under another provision of this section or from seeking sole custody under title 20, chapter 5 of the Wyoming statutes.

Proof by clear and convincing evidence that the parent has been convicted of any of the following crimes may constitute grounds that the parent is unfit to have custody or control of any child and may be grounds for terminating the parent-child relationship as to any child with no requirement that reasonable efforts be made to reunify the family:

Murder or voluntary manslaughter of another child of the parent or aiding and abetting, attempting, conspiring to commit or soliciting such a crime; or

Commission of a felony assault which results in serious bodily injury to a child of the parent. As used in this paragraph “serious bodily injury” means as defined by W.S.

6-1-104

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, evidence that reasonable efforts have been made to preserve and reunify the family is not required in any case in which the court determines any one (1) or more of the following by clear and convincing evidence:

The parental rights of the parent to any other child have been terminated involuntarily;

The parent abandoned, chronically abused, tortured or sexually abused the child;

The parent has been convicted of committing one (1) or more of the following crimes against the child or another child of that parent:

Sexual assault under W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

;

Sexual battery under W.S.

6-2-313

;

Sexual abuse of a minor under W.S.

6-2-314

through

6-2-317

.

The parent is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to W.S.

7-19-302

if the offense involved the child or another child of that parent. This shall not apply if the parent is only required to register for conviction under W.S.

6-2-201

;

Other aggravating circumstances exist indicating that there is little likelihood that services to the family will result in successful reunification.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1; 1998, ch. 111, § 1; 1999, ch. 156, § 1; 2003, ch. 167, § 2; 2010, ch. 55, § 1; 2011, ch. 131, § 1; 2013 ch. 145, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 180, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to making reasonable efforts to preserve the family, see §

14-3-440

.

For disposition of children by court in granting divorce, see §

20-2-201

et seq.

As to desertion of children, see chapter 3 of title 20.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(viii).

The 2011 amendment,

in (a)(i), added the present last sentence.

Laws 2011, ch. 131, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2011.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (c), in the introductory language, added “any one (1) or more of the following,” added (iii) and (iv), and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(ix).

Reasonable efforts.—

Juvenile court properly determined that reunification was no longer in the best interest of the children and that the State could cease making reasonable efforts to reunify the family because those efforts would be inconsistent with the new permanency plan—adoption. RR v. State (In re AM), 2021 WY 119, 497 P.3d 914,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 2021).

Aggravating circumstances.—

Juvenile court abused its discretion by concluding the State had proven by clear and convincing evidence that aggravating circumstances existed that would make reunification between a father and a child unlikely because the facts did not establish severe misconduct toward child; the father was never charged with abuse or neglect of child, and he was taking drug tests and following the case plan so he could have visitation with the child. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

“Other circumstances” in subsection (v) must be different from those listed in the other provisions of subsection (c) and serious enough to warrant the degree of culpability or liability imposed; interpreting subsection (v) in harmony with the other provisions of subsection (c), the legislature logically meant for “other aggravating circumstances” to meet the same level of severity as set out in the preceding provisions. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

Failure to provide father with opportunity to be heard.

—

Supreme court considered a father’s argument that he was deprived of due process in the juvenile proceedings even though it was not raised below because, the issue was of a fundamental nature; the provision the State relied upon when requesting the juvenile court relieve the Department of Family Services of the duty to make reasonable efforts to reunify the father with the child was included within the statute setting out the procedure for termination of parental rights. AA v. State, 2021 WY 18, 479 P.3d 1252,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2021).

In a termination of parental rights action, the trial court violated the father’s due process rights when it determined the best interests of the child without providing the father an opportunity to be heard. The hearing on summary judgment was limited to whether grounds for termination existed and there was no indication in the record that the related, and essential, issue of whether termination was in the best interests of the child was raised or considered. In re NRAE v. Dep't of Family Servs., 2020 WY 121, 472 P.3d 374,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2020).

Evidence sufficient to sustain termination of parental rights under paragraphs (a)(v).

—

District court properly terminated a father’s parental rights to his children as an unfit parent because the Department of Family Services had custody of the children for 15 of the most recent 22 months preceding trial, the father’s history and pattern of behavior were plainly relevant to his current parental fitness, the jury could infer that the father participated in or knew about the mother’s drug use, and the father failed to complete almost every requirement of the case plan, failed to take any steps to assist with therapy and recovery of the children’s significant mental health needs, made no attempts to maintain a relationship with them when he left town, and used methamphetamine as recently as two months before the trial began. Clark v. State (In re GGMC), 2020 WY 50, 460 P.3d 1138,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 2020).

Evidence sufficient to sustain termination of parental rights
under paragraphs (a)(v).—

Clear and
convincing evidence supported the termination of a mother's parental
rights on the ground that the mother was unfit to have custody and
control of the mother's children, despite repeated exposure to substance
abuse treatment and parenting classes, because the mother's behavior
put the children at risk as the mother lived with roommates who had
serious and lengthy criminal histories, participated with the roommates
in distributing drugs, allowed drugs and pornography in the home,
and drove while intoxicated with children in the car. LeBlanc v. State (In re ARLeB), 2017 WY 107, 401 P.3d 932,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2017).

Mother was unfit to have custody or control of the mother’s children because the mother admitted that the children were in foster care under the State of Wyoming’s responsibility for well over 15 of the most recent 22 months. Furthermore, the State presented clear and convincing evidence that, at the time of trial, the mother was not able to meet the children’s physical, mental, or emotional needs, as the mother lost contact with the children and could not provide a positive, nurturing, or safe environment for them. 2019 WY 15,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 15

.

Termination of a mother’s parental rights was appropriate because the children were in foster care for more than the 15 of the last 22 months when the termination petition was filed, the children exhibited significant mental health problems and educational issues, the mother lacked contact with the children while they were in foster care, the mother could not meet the children’s needs, the mother never completed parenting and diagnosis-specific trainings, and the mother did not address the mother’s own mental and physical health concerns. Harmon v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re DKS), 2020 WY 12, 456 P.3d 918,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2020).

Section

1-22-110

(adoption without consent) is not unconstitutional

because it allegedly has different standards for terminating parental rights than this section. The two sections do not serve identical purposes.
In re Adoption of RHA, 702 P.2d 1259,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 516

(Wyo. 1985).

Due process. —

Due to the fundamental nature of the rights affected by a termination action, the procedures involved must satisfy due process and the evidence supporting a termination must be clear and convincing. MB v. Laramie County Dep't of Family Servs. ex rel. LB, 933 P.2d 1126,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1997).

Department of family services failed to comply with affidavit requirements of W.R.C.P. 56(e) to such an extent that clear and convincing evidence standard, required for termination of mother's parental rights, was not met, and district court's failure to hold hearing before terminating mother's parental rights on summary judgment deprived her of due process. CAC v. Natrona County Dep't of Family Servs., 983 P.2d 1205,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1999).

Guardian ad litem did not violate her duties or a mother's due process rights because she presented the child's preference to the jury and did not improperly argue that the jury had to decide the case based upon the child's best interests; the jury needed to know what was required to keep the child healthy and safe in order to determine if his health and safety would be seriously jeopardized if he were returned to the mother. Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

Guardian ad litem entitled to fully participate in termination
case.—

Termination
of parental rights cannot be based solely upon the best interests
of the child, however, that does not mean that the guardian ad litem
cannot participate in the evidentiary portion of the trial; the statutory
provisions setting forth the requirements for termination of parental
rights include factors directly related to the child's well-being. Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

State authorized to terminate parental rights under limited circumstances. —

The state has a compelling interest in the welfare of minor children and has the authority to terminate parental rights under certain limited circumstances, so long as it makes that determination in the best interest of the child and after a hearing. Blair v. Supreme Court of Wyoming, 671 F.2d 389, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 21745 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

So long as there is reason to believe that a positive, nurturing parent-child relationship exists, the state's interest coincides with the parents' interest in preserving, not severing, family bonds. Once a parent has been proven unfit, however, the state's interest in terminating that parent's rights arises. In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Parental rights terminated due to domestic violence and other issues. —

Court properly terminated a father's parental rights where the child was subjected to domestic violence, and where the father failed to follow the case plan, failed to obtain consistent and adequate housing, and failed to visit the child as often as allowed. RS v. Dept. of Family Servs. (In re KLS), 2004 WY 87, 94 P.3d 1025,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2004).

Strict scrutiny required in considering evidence to terminate parental rights. —

It is a fundamental right for one to have custody of his minor child, and the court must, therefore, consider the evidence to terminate parental rights with strict scrutiny. In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Justification for a decision to terminate parental rights by summary judgment encounters rules, including the strict scrutiny standard, because the fundamental liberty of familial association is first presented. Consequently, clear and convincing evidence is required. In re Eb, 795 P.2d 1212,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1990).

Strict scrutiny standard requires that a case for termination of parental rights be established by clear and convincing evidence. LDC v. Department of Family Servs. (In re ZKP), 979 P.2d 953,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1999).

Necessary to show that less intrusive means of protection attempted or impractical. —

It must be shown that less intrusive means of protecting the child (e.g., counseling the parents) have been attempted or are impractical, before parental rights are terminated. In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998).

Failure to follow departmental rules. —

Even though the trial court found clear and convincing evidence of facts sufficient to terminate parental rights, the failure of the department of family services to follow its own rules adversely affected the parent's fundamental rights and mandated reversal of the trial court's order of termination. MB v. Laramie County Dep't of Family Servs. ex rel. LB, 933 P.2d 1126,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1997).

Termination of a mother's parental rights under this section was not invalidated due to a decision not to place children with their maternal grandmother because the placement decision did not affect the mother's ability to visit the children or strengthen a relationship with them; moreover, that placement was unsuitable due to the grandmother's failure to cooperate and the fact that she lived with a convicted sex offender. In addition, the Wyoming Department of Family Services was not required to wait for a second home evaluation for the grandmother after she moved to a different state before commencing termination proceedings against the mother.
K.H. v. Wyo. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re D.H.), 2007 WY 196, 173 P.3d 365,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(Wyo. 2007).

District court did not err when it denied a father’s motion for judgment as a matter of law because the failure of the Department of Family Services to comply with its rules and regulations was harmless; the late completion of the father’s case plan made no difference in the outcome because the father failed to meet the requirements of the case plan, and an earlier explanation of the conditions for visitation or of the case plan requirements would have changed the results. Anastos v. State (In re Asa), 2018 WY 5, 408 P.3d 791,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2018).

Incarceration. —

Termination of the father's parental rights to his children under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-309(a)(iv) was proper because, while the record was clear that a police report was admitted into evidence, the supreme court did not need to determine whether a clear and unequivocal rule of law was violated because the father failed to prove that, if there was error, it was prejudicial. While the officer's report and testimony certainly informed the district court of the factual background regarding the allegations against father in the criminal case, his report and testimony were not necessary to establish that father was incarcerated due to a felony conviction; the father's own testimony established that to be the case, including that the crime was aggravated sexual assault of a minor.
Msh v. Alh, 2012 WY 29, 271 P.3d 983,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Feb. 29, 2012).

Court committed no error in relying upon evidence of rehabilitative efforts in Oklahoma

to sustain the requirement of unsuccessful efforts to rehabilitate the family (i.e., termination of parental rights is the least intrusive means to satisfy the state's interest), by concluding that the evidence of efforts in Oklahoma was clear and convincing on this issue. In In Interest of JG, 742 P.2d 770,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 509

(Wyo. 1987).

Subsection (a)(i) requires findings of both lack of support and lack of communication.

In re Adoption of SLS, 808 P.2d 207,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1991).

Showing that child's well-being jeopardized required. —

Termination of parental rights cannot be ordered on the grounds of abuse or neglect unless the showing is clear and unequivocal that the child's health, mental or physical, and/or his social or educational well-being has actually been placed in jeopardy through the neglect or abuse by the parent. DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980) (decided under prior law).

Consideration of “best interests” of child. —

In considering a termination of the parent-child relationship under subsection (a)(i), the court may consider the best interests of the child only as those interests relate to support and communication. In re Parental Rights of SCN, 659 P.2d 568,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1983).

Burden of proving neglect or abuse

is upon him who seeks to take the child from the parent. DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980) (decided under prior law).

Clear and convincing evidence. —

The case for termination of parental rights must be made by clear and convincing evidence. DKM v. RJS (In re SYM), 924 P.2d 985,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1996).

A father's parental rights were properly terminated where social services made appropriate efforts to reunify him with his child, they gave him notice of a change of goal for the case management, and they offered to pay transportation costs to visit the child and yet the father had no contact with the child for two years and never voluntarily paid child support despite court orders compelling him to do so. EBH v. Hot Springs Dep't of Family Servs., 2001 WY 100, 33 P.3d 172,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2001).

There was clear and convincing evidence that it was in the best interests of a minor child to terminate the parents' rights to the child, since the parents failed to maintain a clean and healthy home for the child; the parents refused to properly feed and care for the child, resulting in health and developmental problems for the child; and the parents lacked stability to care for the child. SD v. Carbon County Dep't of Family Servs. (In re SED), 2002 WY 168, 57 P.3d 1235,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 2002).

Jury could reasonably conclude that placing an eight-month-old baby in a fleece bag and tying it shut placed the child in imminent risk of physical injury under Wyo. Stat. §§ 14-3-202(a)(ii) and (vii),

14-2-309

.
In re Cs v. Johnson County Dep't of Family Servs., 2006 WY 130, 143 P.3d 918,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(2006).

Clear and convincing evidence supported the district court's decision to terminate the mother's parental rights under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-309(a)(v)
because it was undisputed that the children were in foster care for the 15 months preceding the termination hearing and the evidence tending to show that the mother was unfit was substantial. The evidence showed that: (1) the mother displayed an inability to monitor, to make healthy decisions regarding nutrition, or to provide a safe environment for her children; (2) she had a long-established history of surrounding herself and her children with unsafe individuals; (3) she experienced auditory hallucinations and paranoia; (4) she attempted to commit suicide in front of her children; (5) the children were upset with and resistant to visitation with their mother; and (6) the mother failed to complete various parts of her case plan and often refused to cooperate with service providers.
M.L. v. Laramie County Dep't of Family Servs. (In the Interest of L.L.), 2007 WY 92, 159 P.3d 499,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2007).

District court's decision terminating a mother's parental rights pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-309(a)(iii) (2007) was affirmed where the findings that the mother had not maintained a stable residence, been sporadically employed, continued substance abuse, and had made little progress in the treatment of her psychological problems were fully supported by evidence in the record.
MDW v. Hot Springs County Dep't of Family Servs. (In re SRJ), 2009 WY 94, 212 P.3d 611,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2009).

Clear and convincing evidence supported the termination of a father's parental rights under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-309(a)(v) for unfitness, because he had a child abuse conviction, was incarcerated, and had weapons violations; the father also failed to comply with a case plan requiring him to obtain employment, attending counseling, and participate in regular visitation. The Wyoming Department of Family Services was not required to prove that less intrusive alternatives to termination of his parental rights were impractical.
AJJ v. State (In re KMJ), 2010 WY 142, 242 P.3d 968,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 2010).

There was sufficient clear and convincing evidence to support termination of a father’s parental rights because he was unable to meet any of the child’s ongoing needs; the father was in prison at the time of the trial and did not anticipate being released on parole for more than a year, he admitted that he was found guilty of assault and battery on a son he had with another mother, and he had a history of substance abuse. Anastos v. State (In re Asa), 2018 WY 5, 408 P.3d 791,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2018).

District court correctly found clear and convincing evidence supported termination of a mother’s parental rights under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-309(a)(v) (2019) where testimony from various Department of Family Services case workers, counselors, and the mother herself demonstrated a clear pattern of the inability to recognize and provide for the ongoing physical, mental and emotional needs of the children. Dunlap v. State (In re BAD), 2019 WY 83, 446 P.3d 222,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2019).

Evidence was
sufficient to support termination of parental rights under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-309(a)(iv) (2013) given the father's incarceration, alcohol consumption,
and lack of responsibility for the child's schooling and medical
needs. DRW v. DLP (In re ARW), 2015 WY 25, 343 P.3d 407,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2015).

State not required to show reasonable efforts to reunify where abuse and neglect not at issue. —

State was not required to show reasonable efforts to reunify the family in a parental rights termination proceeding where the State did not file termination proceedings on the basis of abuse or neglect by a parent nor did the district court enter its order on that basis. Rather, the State filed termination proceedings, and the district court granted the petition, on the basis that the children were left in the care of another for at least a year and had been in foster care with the state for over fifteen of the last twenty-months, and the parents were unfit. SLJ v. Dep't of Family Servs.(In re SJJ), 2005 WY 3, 104 P.3d 74,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2005).

In a termination of parental rights proceeding, appellant mother failed to prove the Wyoming Department of Family Services (DFS) did not provide reasonable efforts under this section to rehabilitate her; DFS was not required to renew her drug testing contract because the mother appeared for testing infrequently and could have made her own arrangements for drug testing. Appellant had the opportunity but failed to attend team meetings; and DFS pursued less intrusive means of protecting the children such as a guardianship with relatives.
TMC v. Dep't of Family Serv. (In re ARC), 2011 WY 119, 258 P.3d 704,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2011).

Consent to county's custody of children did not constitute “provision for child's support”

under subsection (a)(i). In re SKJ, 673 P.2d 640,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1983).

“Neglect” defined. —

“Neglect” is word of common usage and understanding and can certainly be defined as a failure to do what is needed or required in connection with a factual situation. In re M., 556 P.2d 514,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1976) (decided under prior law).

Finding of “unintentional neglect” does not add ground for termination. —

A finding of “unintentional” neglect, although the word “unintentional” is not used in the statute, is not an addition of a ground for termination of rights constituting an amendment to this article by judicial legislation. In re M., 556 P.2d 514,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1976).

Adoption proceedings. —

In an adoption proceeding, the provisions regarding termination of parental rights found in the adoption statutes (§

1-22-101

et seq.) control over the more general provisions for the termination of parental rights found in this article. GWJ v. MH (In re BGH), 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996).

Mental incapacity. —

In finding the parents unable, because of mental incapacity, to give the child proper care now or in the future and that such inability constituted “neglect,” the courts are considering the best interests and welfare of a child rather than the penalizing of parents. In re M., 556 P.2d 514,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1976).

Family doctor may give opinion on parent's mental age. —

In a case of unintentional neglect by mentally retarded parents, the family doctor with some mental health training and his own personal knowledge is as competent to reach an opinion as to mental age of a parent as is the expert witness whose examination will ordinarily cover a period of time not exceeding one week. In re M., 556 P.2d 514,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1976).

Evidence of abuse by stepfather admissible to show evidence of neglect by mother. —

In a proceeding to terminate parental rights on the grounds of neglect, admitting the evidence of a bruise, spanking and abuse by the stepfather was not an abuse of discretion, for if a stepfather or another abuses a child, it is evidence of neglect if the mother does not take some action to stop the abuse or remove the child from the abusive environment. MS v. Kuchera, 682 P.2d 982,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1984).

Summary judgment improper. —

Summary judgment order terminating parental rights was not appropriately granted where the affidavit of the mother denying abandonment raised a clear factual conflict, especially in light of the strict scrutiny and clear and convincing evidence required for parental rights termination. In In Interest of SVG, 826 P.2d 237,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1992).

Evidence sufficient to terminate parental rights under subsection (a)(iii). —

See In re SKJ, 673 P.2d 640,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 399

(Wyo. 1983).

Father's parental rights to his daughter were properly terminated under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-309(a)(iv) where given the length of the father's term of incarceration, it was extremely improbable that the father would ever be able to appropriately care for the ongoing physical, mental, or emotional needs of his daughter during her minority or indeed well into her adulthood; most importantly, though, the father was convicted on several counts of sexually abusing his daughter. There could be nothing that made him more intrinsically unfit than abusing his child. CDB v. DJE, 2005 WY 102, 118 P.3d 439,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2005).

Termination of parental rights was justified by evidence of children's inadequate care, maintenance and supervision, as well as inappropriate physical punishment, and where agencies' extensive rehabilitative efforts had been unsuccessful, and children's health and safety would be jeopardized if they were returned to parents. RS v. Johnson County Dept. of Family Servs. (In re JL), 989 P.2d 1268,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1999).

Where the record disclosed long-term general neglect and the detailed instances were adequate to show by clear and convincing evidence that a mother had neglected, if not abused, her child and was unable to provide the child with basic health and safety within the prescribed statutory guidelines and where the State had met its responsibility to provide the services necessary to accomplish the specific goals and tasks called for before reunification could occur and yet the mother had made minimal progress toward meeting those goals, the court correctly terminated the mother's parental rights.MN v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In the Interest of
MN), 2003 WY 135, 78 P.3d 232,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2003).

Clear and convincing evidence supported the termination of appellant mother's parental rights under this section, because drugs and drug paraphernalia were found in the home within the reach of the children when they were taken into custody, the Wyoming Department of Family Services provided reasonable efforts to rehabilitate her by focusing on the drug issues, and appellant failed to comply with the service plan by missing drug tests and continuing to test positive for illegal drugs. Appellant failed to recognize her drug addiction, and the children's health and safety would be seriously jeopardized by returning them to her care; in fact, the children's health had improved in foster care.
TMC v. Dep't of Family Serv. (In re ARC), 2011 WY 119, 258 P.3d 704,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2011).

Court properly terminated a mother's parental rights on the basis of unfitness because testimony revealed that the mother's substance abuse issues caused significant concern and created a barrier to the mother's reunification with her children; the mother failed to make progress under the service plan due to her inability to stay sober. The mother was also on probation in a criminal matter at the time of the hearing, and she continued to fail court-ordered urinalysis tests.
ZMETS v. State, 2012 WY 68, 276 P.3d 392,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2012).

Evidence insufficient to sustain termination of parental rights under paragraph (a)(i). —

Where the father was incarcerated for the commission of a felony and had additional charges pending against him, the mother sought termination of parental rights pursuant to subsection (a)(i). In its decision letter the district court found termination under this section inappropriate, because the mother did not establish that the father had left the child in the care of another; in fact, he had never met the child.
JLW v. CAB (In re WDW), 2010 WY 9, 224 P.3d 14,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2010).

Evidence fell short of meeting the mother's burden to prove grounds for termination under(a)(1) of this section, as the father consistently sent letter and cards to his children while he was incarcerated, in spite of the fact that no communication came back, and he attempted to initiate communication through visitation once he was placed on supervised release. RAA v. AW, 2016 WY 117, 384 P.3d 1156,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2016).

Evidence sufficient to establish neglect. —

See In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Clark v. Alexander, 953 P.2d 145,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1998); TR v. Washakie County Dep't of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 736 P.2d 712,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 431

(Wyo. 1987).

Evidence of filthy and unsafe conditions in home, and of failure of six years of rehabilitative efforts, was sufficient to justify termination of mother's parental rights. LDC v. Department of Family Servs. (In re ZKP), 979 P.2d 953,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1999).

Evidence of unclean premises insufficient for termination. —

Evidence of isolated instances of unclean premises, dirty dishes and related matters is not sufficient grounds for termination. In re M., 556 P.2d 514,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1976).

Divorced parent's joblessness alone is insufficient basis for severing parent-child relationship.

In re Parental Rights of SCN, 659 P.2d 568,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1983).

Evidence insufficient to establish abuse or neglect. —

See DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980).

Evidence insufficient to terminate parental rights under subsection (a)(iii). —

Where the father's five children were living in an extremely dirty home, the Wyoming Department of Family Services (DFS) did not provide evidence to connect his marijuana use with his unfitness as a parent; testimony indicated that he was a good father figure, and never used marijuana in the presence of the children. In the termination of parental rights action brought under this section, DFS did not prove by clear and convincing evidence that returning the children to the father would be a risk to their health or safety.
State v. TWE (In re ATE), 2009 WY 155, 222 P.3d 142,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 2009).

Conviction of child abuse justifies termination. —

Even if father had been successful in arguing the insufficiency of the evidence to terminate his parental rights for abuse, the judgment of termination would have to stand because of his conviction of the felony of child abuse, coupled with the clear and convincing evidence that he was an unfit parent by any standard. In In Interest of JG, 742 P.2d 770,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 509

(Wyo. 1987).

Rights terminated for rape, resistance to rehabilitation. —

Evidence warranted the termination of the father's parental rights, where the record showed that he had repeatedly committed forcible rapes, beginning when he was 17 years old, culminating in the rape and death of an elderly woman, for which he was presently incarcerated under an extended prison sentence, and that he had resisted a rehabilitative program for sexual offenders available to him. In re Adoption of JLP, 774 P.2d 624,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1989).

Appeal.—

District court
did not err in terminating a father's parental rights to his children
because the father's pro se “Brief Letter” presented
no cogent legal argument; the letter presented no legal argument
at
all. NRL v. State (In re NRL), 2015 WY 27, 344 P.3d 759,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 2015).

Incarceration. —

“Incarceration,” as used in subdivision (a)(iv), is an unambiguous term entitled to its plain and ordinary meaning. DKM v. RJS (In re SYM), 924 P.2d 985,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1996).

Where the father was incarcerated for the commission of a felony and had additional charges pending against him, he had struggled with drug and alcohol abuse when not in prison; he never voluntarily paid child support, and had never met his child. The district court's decision to terminate the father's parental rights under subsection (a)(iv) was supported by clear and convincing evidence.
JLW v. CAB (In re WDW), 2010 WY 9, 224 P.3d 14,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2010).

Incarceration, per se, justifies termination. —

Where the termination of parental rights is premised, under subsection (a)(iv), upon the parent's incarceration, the state has no burden to demonstrate the unavailability of means less intrusive than termination. RW v. State, 766 P.2d 555,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1989).

When termination of parental rights is sought pursuant to subsection (a)(iv), the petitioner must establish: (1) that the parent is incarcerated due to a felony conviction; and (2) that the parent is unfit to have custody and control of the child. DKM v. RJS (In re SYM), 924 P.2d 985,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1996).

And conviction not affected by pending writ. —

The pendency of an application for a discretionary writ of certiorari to the United States supreme court in the case of the natural parents' second-degree murder convictions did not affect the status of those convictions for purposes of subsection (a)(iv). RW v. State, 766 P.2d 555,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1989).

But where mother's felony conviction was on appeal as of right,

it could not qualify as a “conviction” for purposes of subdivision (a)(iv) of this section, until it was finally resolved by court. CAC v. Natrona County Dep't of Family Servs., 983 P.2d 1205,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1999).

Evidence sufficient to sustain termination of parental rights under paragraphs (a)(i) and (a)(v). —

Mother's parental rights were properly terminated where the children lived with their grandmother for many years, the mother provided no monetary support, and the mother visited the children only a few times. SLJ v. Dep't of Family Servs.(In re SJJ), 2005 WY 3, 104 P.3d 74,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2005).
